Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0220.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 206a. (1) A recipient or his or her the recipient's individual representative or an individual permitted to file a petition for treatment under section 434 must be offered an opportunity to request mediation to resolve a dispute between the recipient, or his or her the recipient's individual representative, or the individual permitted to file a petition for treatment under section 434 and the community mental health services program or other service provider under contract with the community mental health services program its contracted service provider related to the planning and providing of the recipient's services or supports. to the recipient.This subsection does not apply to a recipient who is hospitalized. (2) The community mental health services program or contracted service provider shall provide notice to notify a recipient, or his or her the recipient's individual representative, or the individual permitted to file a petition for treatment under section 434 of the right to request and access mediation at the time services or supports are initiated and at least annually after. that. When the community mental health services program's or its contracted service provider's local dispute resolution process, local appeals process, or state Medicaid fair hearing is requested, notification of the right to request mediation must also be provided to the recipient, or his or her the recipient's individual representative, or the individual permitted to file a petition for treatment under section 434. (3) The department must shall provide funding for, and directly contract with, 1 or more mediation organizations experienced in coordinating statewide case intake and mediation service delivery through local community dispute resolution centers. (4) A mediator must be an individual trained in effective mediation technique and mediator standard of conduct. A mediator must be knowledgeable in the laws, regulations, and administrative practices relating to providing the provision of behavioral health services and supports. The mediator must not be involved in any manner with the dispute or with providing services or supports to the recipient. (5) The If mediation is requested, the community mental health services program or contracted service provider described in subsection (2) involved in the dispute must participate. in mediation if mediation is requested. (6) A request for mediation must be recorded by a mediation organization, and mediation must begin within no later than 10 business days after the recording. Mediation does not prevent a recipient, or his or her the recipient's individual representative, or the individual permitted to file a petition for treatment under section 434 from using another available dispute resolution option, including, but not limited to, the community mental health services program's local dispute resolution process, the local appeals process, the state Medicaid fair hearing, or filing a recipient rights complaint. A mediation organization shall ascertain if an alternative dispute resolution process is currently ongoing and notify the process administrator of the request for mediation. The parties may agree to voluntarily suspend other dispute resolution processes, unless prohibited by law or precluded by a report of an apparent or suspected violation of rights delineated in chapter 7. (7) Mediation must be completed within not later than 30 days after the date the mediation was recorded unless the parties agree in writing to extend the mediation period for up to an additional 30 days. The mediation process must not exceed 60 days. (8) If the dispute is resolved through the mediation process, the mediator shall prepare a legally binding document that includes outlining the terms of the agreement. The document must be signed by the The recipient, or the recipient's individual representative, or the individual permitted to file a petition for treatment under section 434 and a party with the authority an individual authorized to bind the community mental health services program or its contracted service provider according to the terms of the agreement shall both sign the document. The mediator must shall provide a copy of the signed document to all parties within each party not later than 10 business days after the end of the mediation process. The signed document is enforceable in any court all courts of competent jurisdiction in this state. (9) If the dispute is not resolved through the mediation process, the mediator must shall prepare a document that indicates stating that the dispute could not be resolved. The mediator shall provide a copy of the document to all parties within each party not later than 10 business days after the end of the mediation process. (10) A contracted mediation organization must shall provide a report with aggregate data and a summary of outcomes to the department every 6 months, or as the department considers appropriate, to review and evaluate the effectiveness and efficiency of mediation in resolving disputes relating to the community mental health services program's and its contracted service provider's planning and providing of services and supports. by the community mental health services program and its service providers. (11) As used in this section, "recording" means a file that has been was created after a request for mediation has been was made by a recipient, or his or her the recipient's individual representative, or an individual permitted to file a petition for treatment under section 434 or received by a community mental health services program or other its contracted service provider. under contract with the community mental health services program. Sec. 429. (1) A hospital designated under section 422 shall receive and detain an individual presented for examination under section 426, 427, 434, 435, 436, or 438, for not more than 24 hours. During that time the individual must be examined by a A physician or a licensed psychologist shall examine the individual unless the hospital already received a clinical certificate. has already been presented to the hospital. If the examining physician or licensed psychologist does not certify that the individual is a person an individual requiring treatment, the individual shall be released immediately. the hospital shall immediately release the individual. If the examining physician or licensed psychologist executes a clinical certificate, the individual may be hospitalized under section 423. (2) If a preadmission screening unit provides an examination examines an individual under section 409, 410, or 427, the examination shall be conducted preadmission screening unit shall examine the individual as soon as possible after the individual arrives at the preadmission screening site, and the examination must be completed within in 2 hours, unless there are documented medical reasons why the examination cannot be completed within in that time frame or the peace officer or security transport officer and the preadmission screening unit agree on other arrangements. are agreed upon by the peace officer or security transport officer and the preadmission screening unit.